Utah statutes.
58-40-6.   Scope of practice.

(1)  A master therapeutic recreational specialist may:

(a)  practice recreational therapy as an employee of a hospital, clinic, agency, or other facility, in private practice, or as a consultant; and

(b)  supervise and train other licensees under this chapter.

(2)  A therapeutic recreational specialist may:

(a)  practice recreational therapy as the employee of a hospital, clinic, agency, or other facility; and

(b)  supervise other licensees under this chapter.

(3)  A therapeutic recreational technician may:

(a)  perform recreational therapy services only:

(i)  under the supervision of a master therapeutic recreational specialist or a therapeutic recreational specialist employed full-time, on-site in the same hospital, clinic, or facility; or

(ii)  in consultation with a master therapeutic recreational specialist;

(b)  maintain the ongoing documentation of services provided in accordance with a treatment or intervention plan only:

(i)  under the supervision of either a master therapeutic recreational specialist or a therapeutic recreational specialist employed full-time, on-site; or

(ii)  in consultation with a master therapeutic recreational specialist; and

(c)  not perform assessments or prescribe or modify a treatment or intervention plan or approve or cosign modifications to a treatment or intervention plan.

